zh-CN: 桨板预期用途: 全能型; 钓鱼; 儿童; 多人; 竞速; 冲浪; 旅行; 激流; 瑜伽; 其他
bg-BG: Предназначение на падълборда: Универсален; За риболов; За деца; За много хора; За състезания; За сърфиране; За туризъм; За бързи води; За йога; Друго
el: Προβλεπόμενη χρήση του paddleboard: All-around; Για ψάρεμα; Παιδικό; Για πολλά άτομα; Αγωνιστικό; Surf; Touring; Άγρια νερά; Γιόγκα; Άλλο
en: Paddleboard intended use: All-around; Fishing; Kids; Multi-person; Racing; Surf; Touring; Whitewater; Yoga; Other
ro-RO: Utilizarea prevăzută a plăcii de paddleboarding: Universal; Pescuit; Copii; Pentru mai multe persoane; Curse; Surf; Drumeții; Ape repezi; Yoga; Altele
fr: Usage prévu du paddleboard: Polyvalent; Pêche; Enfant; Multipersonne; Course; Surf; Randonnée; Eau vive; Yoga; Autre
ru: Назначение сапборда: Универсальный; Для рыбалки; Детский; Многоместный; Гоночный; Для серфинга; Туринговый; Для бурной воды; Для йоги; Другое
sv: Avsedd användning av paddelbräda: Allround; Fiske; Barn; Flera personer; Tävling; Surf; Touring; Forspaddling; Yoga; Övrigt
th: วัตถุประสงค์การใช้งานของแพดเดิลบอร์ด: อเนกประสงค์; ตกปลา; เด็ก; หลายคน; แข่งขัน; เซิร์ฟ; ทัวร์ริ่ง; ล่องแก่ง; โยคะ; อื่นๆ
pl: Zamierzone użycie paddleboardu: Wszechstronna; Wędkarstwo; Dla dzieci; Wieloosobowa; Wyścigowa; Surfing; Turystyczna; Górska rzeka; Joga; Inne
de: Verwendungszweck des Paddleboards: Allround; Angeln; Kinder; Mehrpersonen; Racing; Surfen; Touring; Wildwasser; Yoga; Sonstige
it: Uso previsto del paddleboard: All-around; Pesca; Bambini; Più persone; Corsa; Surf; Touring; Acque bianche; Yoga; Altro
pt-BR: Prancha de stand up paddle uso previsto: Uso geral; Pesca; Infantil; Para várias pessoas; Corrida; Surfe; Touring; Corredeiras; Yoga; Outro
tr: Paddleboard kullanım amacı: Çok amaçlı; Balıkçılık; Çocuk; Çoklu kişi; Yarış; Sörf; Tur; Akarsu; Yoga; Diğer
nl: Paddleboard beoogd gebruik: Allround; Vissen; Kinderen; Meerdere personen; Racen; Surfen; Toeren; Wildwater; Yoga; Overig
zh-TW: 槳板預定用途: 全能; 釣魚; 兒童; 多人; 競速; 衝浪; 巡航; 激流; 瑜珈; 其他
hr-HR: Namjena daske za veslanje: Svestrana namjena; Ribolov; Za djecu; Za više osoba; Utrke; Surfanje; Turistička vožnja; Divlje vode; Joga; Ostalo
es: Uso previsto de la tabla de paddleboard: Todoterreno; Pesca; Para niños; Para varias personas; Carreras; Surf; Travesía; Aguas bravas; Yoga; Otro
lt-LT: Irklentės paskirtis: Universalus; Žvejybai; Vaikams; Keliems asmenims; Lenktynėms; Banglenčių sportui; Turistinis; Sraunioms upėms; Jogai; Kita
hu: Eveződeszka rendeltetésszerű felhasználása: Általános; Horgászat; Gyerek; Többszemélyes; Verseny; Szörf; Túra; Vadvízi; Jóga; Egyéb
nb: Tiltenkt bruk for padlebrett: Allround; Fiske; Barn; Flere personer; Racing; Surfing; Tur; Elvepadling; Yoga; Annet
ko: 패들보드 용도: 올어라운드; 낚시용; 아동용; 다인용; 레이싱; 서프; 투어링; 급류용; 요가용; 기타
sk-SK: Zamýšľané použitie paddleboardu: Univerzálne; Na rybolov; Pre deti; Pre viac osôb; Závodné; Na surfovanie; Turistické; Na divokú vodu; Na jogu; Iné
sl-SI: Predviden namen uporabe deske za veslanje: Vsestransko; Ribolov; Za otroke; Za več oseb; Tekmovalno; Deskanje na valovih; Turno; Divje vode; Joga; Drugo
ja: パドルボードの用途: オールラウンド; 釣り; キッズ; 複数人; レーシング; サーフィン; ツーリング; ホワイトウォーター; ヨガ; その他
fi: Suppilaudan käyttötarkoitus: Yleiskäyttöinen; Kalastus; Lapset; Monelle hengelle; Kilpailu; Surffaus; Retkeily; Koskimelonta; Jooga; Muu
da: Tilsigtet brug af paddleboard: Allround; Fiskeri; Børn; Til flere personer; Racing; Surf; Touring; Whitewater; Yoga; Andet
cs: Zamýšlené použití paddleboardu: Všestranné; Rybaření; Pro děti; Pro více osob; Závodní; Surf; Turistické; Divoká voda; Jóga; Jiné
pt-PT: Utilização prevista da prancha de stand up paddle: Versátil; Pesca; Crianças; Multilugar; Corrida; Surf; Turismo; Águas bravas; Ioga; Outro
vi: Mục đích sử dụng của ván chèo: Đa năng; Câu cá; Trẻ em; Nhiều người; Đua; Lướt sóng; Đường dài; Vượt thác; Yoga; Khác